Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska49-14,113
Individual appointed to fill a vacancy; term.

An individual appointed to fill a vacancy, occurring other than by the expiration of a term of office, shall be appointed for the unexpired term of the member such individual succeeds and shall be eligible for appointment to one full six-year term thereafter.

Laws 1976, LB 987, § 113;

Laws 1991, LB 232, § 9.